Georgia, session 2025_26, HB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to carrying and possession of firearms, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"16-11-132.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'firearm' means any handgun, rifle, shotgun, or
similar device or weapon which will or can be converted to expel a projectile by the action
of an explosive or electrical charge.
(b) Any owner of a firearm who possesses, stores, or leaves the loaded or unloaded firearm
in a manner in which he or she knew or should have known that another individual could
H. B. 63
- 1 -

LC 52 0655
obtain the firearm shall be guilty of the offense of failure to adequately secure a firearm
when the firearm is obtained by:
(1) A minor and exhibited in a public place or while making a threat of violence; or
(2) Any individual, regardless of age, and used during the commission of a crime or
during an act which results in the injury or death of such individual or another when such
act was not the lawful defense of people or property.
(c) A violation of this Code section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less
than $500.00."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 63
- 2 -